Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1. Section 2 of  this 2025 Act is added to and made a part of ORS 433.110 to
433.770.
SECTION 2. (1) The Oregon Health  Authority shall maintain a state public health labo-
ratory that is capable of:
(a) Analyzing biological and environmental samples for public health purposes; and
(b) Performing newborn bloodspot screening as specified in ORS 433.285.
(2) In accordance with rules adopted by the authority, the state public health laboratory
may analyze samples or perform newborn bloodspot screening for any:
(a) Country or territory;
(b) Federal agency;
(c) Agency of another state;
(d) Tribal agency; or
(e) Health care practitioner licensed in any country, territory or state.
(3) The authority shall adopt rules necessary to implement this section and  ORS 433.285,
433.290 and 433.295, including but not limited to rules establishing laboratory fees for analysis
and screening services.
(4) All moneys collected under  subsection (3) of this section shall be deposited in the
Public Health Account established in ORS 431.210 to be used for expenses of  the state public
health laboratory.
SECTION 3.
 ORS 433.285 is amended to read:
433.285. [(1) It hereby is declared to be a matter  of public policy of the State of Oregon that in the
interest of public health and the prevention of mental retardation,  every infant, shall be given tests
approved by the Oregon Health Authority for the detection  of the disease of phenylketonuria and other
metabolic diseases. ]
[(2) The authority by rule shall specify the diseases for which infants shall be tested under sub-
section (1) of this section, the appropriate time  following delivery for collecting specimens, the manner
in which  the specimens are to be submitted, the persons responsible for submitting the specimens, the
methods of testing and the manner of payment of the fees. ]
[(3) The testing required by subsection (1) of this section shall not be required  if the infant is being
reared as an  adherent to a religion the teachings of which are opposed to such testing. The person
Enrolled House Bill 2741 (HB 2741-A) Page 1
responsible for submitting specimens under the rules of the authority shall be responsible for submitting
a statement signed by the infant’s parent that the infant  is being so reared. The authority by rule shall
prescribe the form of the statement. ]
[(4) The authority shall adopt by rule a procedure  whereby the fees established under subsection
(2) of this section  shall be waived and no infant refused service because of the parent’s inability to pay
the fee. ]
[(5) The authority by rule shall prescribe the procedure to  be followed in cases where initial testing
for metabolic diseases is administered too early to detect these  diseases, where the sample submitted for
testing is improperly collected and where a sample  shows an abnormal result. The authority, within the
limits of funds available from fees collected under this section, shall institute a pilot program for
follow-up on abnormal test results. ]
(1)(a) It is the public health policy of the State  of Oregon that each infant in Oregon
undergo newborn bloodspot screening for medical conditions that, if detected  early, can be
mitigated or treated to prevent harmful health effects.
(b) The Oregon Health Authority shall administer a newborn bloodspot screening pro-
gram to advance the public health policy described in paragraph (a) of this subsection.
(2) The state public health laboratory,  or another laboratory pursuant to an agreement
with the authority, shall conduct the screenings described in subsection (1) of this section.
(3) The authority shall adopt rules  necessary to implement the newborn bloodspot
screening program, including but not limited to rules establishing:
(a) The medical conditions for which infants are screened, including higher tier testing;
(b) The person responsible for:
(A) The collection of specimens for screening;
(B) The delivery of specimens to the state public health laboratory for screening;
(C) The delivery of signed exemption forms to the state public health laboratory; and
(D) Following up with the parents or guardians of an infant  to discuss the screening re-
sults;
(c) The timing and manner for collection and  delivery of specimens to the state public
health laboratory for screening;
(d) The timing and manner for recollection  and redelivery, if necessary, of specimens to
the state public health laboratory for screening;
(e) Standards for the retention, use and release of residual specimens;
(f) Fees for screening in an amount sufficient  to cover the costs to administer the new-
born bloodspot screening program;
(g) A process for a parent or guardian to request  a fee waiver if the parent or guardian
is indigent or otherwise unable to pay the fee for screening services;
(h) The timing and manner for reporting screening results to  the medical providers of
an infant; and
(i) The exemption form described in subsection (6) of this section.
(4) The inability of a parent or guardian to pay the  fee established under subsection (3)
of this section may not be a basis to refuse to provide  newborn bloodspot screening services
to an infant.
(5) A carrier, as that term is defined in ORS 743B.005, and a coordinated  care organiza-
tion, as that term is defined in ORS 414.025, shall cover the costs  of newborn bloodspot
screening.
(6) A parent or guardian of an infant may decline to  screen the infant under the newborn
bloodspot screening program if the parent or guardian  opposes screening for religious or
philosophical reasons and signs an exemption form prescribed by the authority by rule.
(7) All information and documentation related to the newborn  bloodspot screening pro-
gram that identifies an infant, a parent or guardian of an infant or a health care provider
involved in the care of an infant is  confidential and exempt from public disclosure under ORS
192.311 to 192.478.
Enrolled House Bill 2741 (HB 2741-A) Page 2
SECTION 4.  ORS 433.290 is amended to read:
433.290. [(1) The Legislative Assembly finds that many newborn  children are given their first tests
for metabolic diseases too early for the  detection of these diseases because parents remove these new-
born infants from the hospital before the optimum testing period commences. To  assure proper first
testing and follow-up testing and increase knowledge about the nature and results  of these diseases, the
Oregon Health  Authority shall institute and carry on an intensive educational program among physi-
cians, naturopathic physicians, hospitals, public health nurses, the parents of  newborn children and the
public concerning the disease of phenylketonuria and other metabolic diseases. This  educational pro-
gram shall include information concerning: ]
[(a) The nature of these diseases; and ]
[(b) Examinations for the detection of these diseases in infancy in order that measures may be taken
to prevent the mental retardation resulting from these diseases. ]
[(2) The authority shall make a special effort specifically to inform expectant parents  and parents
of newborn children of the necessity of newborn  infants receiving appropriate tests within the optimum
time range after birth to prevent the mental retardation or other  serious complications resulting from
these diseases.]
(1) To ensure proper testing and follow-up care and increase  public awareness of the
newborn bloodspot screening program described in ORS 433.285, the Oregon Health Authority
shall, subject to available resources, implement:
(a) An educational program for health care providers,  expectant parents, parents or
guardians of infants and the general public.
(b) A follow-up monitoring program to improve long-term care of individuals with medical
conditions identified through screening.
(2) The educational program must:
(a) Provide information on the medical conditions  for which infants are screened under
the newborn bloodspot screening program;
(b) Provide information on the importance of newborn bloodspot screening to prevent or
mitigate the harmful health effects of medical conditions for which infants  are screened; and
(c) If a newborn bloodspot screening detects  a medical condition for an infant, provide
the parents or guardians of the infant information on organizations that serve populations
impacted by the medical condition.
SECTION 5.
 ORS 433.295 is amended to read:
433.295. [(1) All physicians, public health nurses and the  administrators of hospitals shall report
the discovery of cases of phenylketonuria to the Oregon Health Authority. ]
[(2) The authority shall furnish forms that all physicians, public health nurses  and hospitals shall
use to report to the authority the test results for phenylketonuria. ]
Health care providers and health care facilities  that provide services to infants in Oregon
shall:
(1) Ensure that specimens for newborn bloodspot screening are collected  and delivered
pursuant to rules adopted by the Oregon Health Authority under ORS 433.285;
(2) Ensure that an infant receives medically appropriate care  consistent with the results
of a newborn bloodspot screening; and
(3) Report to the authority for quality control purposes:
(a) Medical conditions  detected by newborn bloodspot screening and subsequently con-
firmed; and
(b) Medical conditions on  the newborn bloodspot screening panel detected by a test other
than newborn bloodspot screening.
SECTION 6.
ORS 431A.750 is repealed.
Enrolled House Bill 2741 (HB 2741-A) Page 3
Passed by House March 17, 2025
Repassed by House May 19, 2025
..................................................................................
Timothy G. Sekerak, Chief Clerk of House
..................................................................................
Julie Fahey, Speaker of House
Passed by Senate May 13, 2025
..................................................................................
Rob Wagner, President of Senate
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
..................................................................................
Tobias Read, Secretary of State
Enrolled House Bill 2741 (HB 2741-A) Page 4